Maryland, session 2025, SB0207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
16–205.
(b) The Administration:
(1) Shall revoke the license of any person who has been convicted OF, OR
GRANTED PROBATION BEFORE JUDGMENT UNDER § 6–220 OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE FOR, A VIOLATION under:
(I) Title 2, Subtitle 5 of the Criminal Law Article[, of] FOR homicide
by a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, impaired by alcohol, or impaired by
any drug, any combination of drugs, a combination of one or more drugs and alcohol, or a
controlled dangerous substance;
– 1 –

Ch. 366 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) § 21–902(A), (B), (C), OR (D) OF THIS ARTICLE FOR DRIVING
WHILE UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF ALCOHOL OR ALCOHOL PER SE, IMPAIRED BY
ALCOHOL, OR IMPAIRED BY ANY DRUG, ANY COMBINATION OF DRUGS, A
COMBINATION OF ONE OR MORE DRUGS AND ALCOHOL, OR A CONTROLLED
DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE THAT CONTRIBUTES TO AN ACCIDENT THAT RESULTS IN
THE DEATH OR LIFE–THREATENING INJURY OF ANOTHER PERSON; OR
(III) § 20–102 OF THIS ARTICLE FOR FAILURE TO REMAIN AT THE
SCENE OF AN ACCIDENT THAT RESULTS IN THE DEATH OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY
OF ANOTHER PERSON; and
(2) May not issue a temporary license to drive for any person whose license
has been revoked under item (1) of this subsection during an administrative appeal of the
revocation.
16–208.
(b) (1) Any individual whose license or privilege to drive has been revoked may
apply for reinstatement of the individual’s license or privilege as provided in this
subsection.
(2) (i) If it is the individual’s first revocation, the individual may file a
reinstatement application at any time after the day the revoked license is surrendered to
and received by the Administration or, in the case of an individual who does not have a
license issued under this title, after the effective date of the revocation.
(ii) Except as provided in paragraph [(6)] (7) of this subsection, on
receipt of the application, the Administration may reinstate the license or privilege 6
months after the revoked license is received by the Administration or, in the case of an
individual who does not have a license issued under this title, 6 months after the effective
date of revocation.
(3) (i) If it is the individual’s second revocation, the individual may file
a reinstatement application at any time after 1 year from the day the revoked license is
surrendered to and received by the Administration or, in the case of an individual who does
not have a license issued under this title, after 1 year from the effective date of revocation.
(ii) Except as provided in paragraph [(6)] (7) of this subsection, on
receipt of the application, the Administration may reinstate the license or privilege.
(4) (i) If it is the individual’s third revocation, the individual may file a
reinstatement application at any time after 18 months from the day the revoked license is
surrendered to and received by the Administration or, in the case of an individual who does
not have a license issued under this title, after 18 months from the effective date of
revocation.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 366
(ii) Except as provided in paragraph [(6)] (7) of this subsection, on
receipt of the application, the Administration may reinstate the license or privilege.
(5) (i) If it is the individual’s fourth or subsequent revocation, the
individual may file a reinstatement application at any time after 2 years from the day the
revoked license is surrendered to and received by the Administration or, in the case of an
individual who does not have a license issued under this title, after 2 years from the
effective date of revocation.
(ii) Except as provided in paragraph [(6)] (7) of this subsection, on
receipt of the application, the Administration may reinstate the license or privilege.
(6) (I) IF EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IF THE INDIVIDUAL’S LICENSE IS REVOKED UNDER §
16–205(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE INDIVIDUAL MAY FILE A REINSTATEMENT
APPLICATION AT ANY TIME AFTER 5 YEARS FROM THE DAY THE REVOKED LICENSE
IS SURRENDERED TO AND RECEIVED BY THE ADMINISTRATION OR, IN THE CASE OF
AN INDIVIDUAL WHO DOES NOT HAVE A LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS TITLE, AFTER
5 YEARS FROM THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF REVOCATION.
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL MAY FILE A REINSTATEMENT
APPLICATION AT ANY TIME AFTER 2 YEARS FROM THE DAY THE REVOKED LICENSE
IS SURRENDERED TO AND RECEIVED BY THE ADMINISTRATION OR, IN THE CASE OF
AN INDIVIDUAL WHO DOES NOT HAVE A LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS TITLE, AFTER
2 YEARS FROM THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF REVOCATION IF THE ADMINISTRATION
FINDS THAT:
1. NOT ALLOWING THE INDIVIDUAL TO FILE A
REINSTATEMENT APPLICATION WILL CAUSE UNDUE HARDSHIP; OR
2. EXTENUATING CIRCUMSTANCES EXIST JUSTIFYING
THE FILING OF A REINSTATEMENT APPLICATION.
(II) (III) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, ON RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY
REINSTATE THE LICENSE OR PRIVILEGE.
(7) (i) The Administration may not reinstate a license or privilege to
drive under this subsection if the license or privilege has been refused, revoked, suspended,
or canceled under any other provision of the Maryland Vehicle Law.
(ii) 1. In this subparagraph, “alcohol–related or drug–related
driving incident” means a:
– 3 –

Ch. 366 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
A. Conviction or probation before judgment for a violation of
§ 21–902(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this article or a substantially similar law of another
jurisdiction;
B. Refusal to submit to a test under § 16–205.1 of this subtitle
or a substantially similar law of another jurisdiction; or
C. Test result that indicates an alcohol concentration of 0.10
or more at the time of testing under § 16–205.1 of this subtitle or a substantially similar
law of another jurisdiction.
2. Alcohol–related or drug–related driving incidents
committed at the same time or arising out of the same circumstances may not be considered
separate alcohol–related or drug–related driving incidents for the purpose of this
subparagraph.
3. Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) through [(5)] (6) of this
subsection, the Administration may reinstate a license or privilege to drive only if, after an
investigation of an individual’s habits and driving ability, the Administration is satisfied it
will be safe to reinstate the license or privilege of an individual who has been:
A. Involved in any combination of three or more separate
alcohol–related or drug–related driving incidents;
B. Involved in a vehicular accident resulting in the death of
another person; or
C. Convicted of a violation for failing to stop after a vehicular
accident resulting in bodily injury or death.
[(7)] (8) Except as otherwise provided in this title, before issuing a new
license, the Administration shall require the applicant to submit to the examinations that
it considers appropriate.
16–404.1.
(d) (1) (i) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, an individual
shall be a participant if:
1. The individual is convicted of, or is granted probation
before judgment under § 6–220 of the Criminal Procedure Article for, a violation of §
21–902(a) or (b) of this article;
2. The individual’s license is suspended or revoked under §
16–205 of this title for a violation of § 21–902(b) of this article or under § 16–404 of this
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 366
subtitle for an accumulation of points under § 16–402(a)(29) of this subtitle for driving while
impaired by alcohol;
3. The individual’s license is suspended or revoked under §
16–205 of this title or § 16–402(a)(38) of this subtitle for a violation of § 21–902(a) of this
article;
4. The individual’s license is revoked under § 16–205(b) of
this title or suspended or revoked for an accumulation of points under § 16–402(a)(37) of
this subtitle for:
A. Homicide by motor vehicle while under the influence of
alcohol or alcohol per se, homicide by motor vehicle while impaired by alcohol, or homicide
by motor vehicle while impaired by a combination of one or more drugs and alcohol; [or]
B. Life–threatening injury by motor vehicle while under the
influence of alcohol or alcohol per se, life–threatening injury by motor vehicle while
impaired by alcohol, or life–threatening injury by motor vehicle while impaired by one or
more drugs and alcohol; or
C. FAILURE TO REMAIN AT THE SCENE OF AN ACCIDENT
THAT RESULTS IN THE DEATH OR BODILY INJURY OF ANOTHER PERSON; OR
5. The individual is required to be a participant by a court
order under § 27–107.1 of this article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 5 –